Virginia statutes. Title 5.1. Aviation.
Article 2. Funds for Acquisition, Operation, etc.

§ 5.1-42.
Payment of purchase price or award for land acquired; issuance of bonds.

The purchase price or award for real property acquired for an airport or landing field may be paid for by the appropriation of moneys available therefor or wholly or partly paid from the proceeds of the sale of bonds of the city, town or county as the governing body of the city, town or county shall determine. Such city, town or county is hereby authorized to issue bonds for such purpose or purposes, subject, however, to the approval of such bond issue at a referendum thereon, if such approval is a prerequisite to the issuance of bonds by any such political subdivision of the Commonwealth for public purposes generally.

History.

Code 1950, § 5-33; 1966, c. 576.

§ 5.1-43.
Expenses of construction, operation, etc., to be paid by political subdivision.

The expenses of such construction, improvement, equipment, maintenance and operation shall be paid by such political subdivision, from available funds, subject to all applicable constitutional provisions.

History.

Code 1950, § 5-35; 1966, c. 576.

§ 5.1-44.
Rules and regulations; fees and charges.

The governing body of such city, town or county, or a board, commission, authority or body created under § 5.1-36, may adopt regulations not in conflict with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Board from time to time and establish fees or other charges for the use of such airport or landing field or may authorize an officer representing such city, town, county, board, commission, authority or body to adopt such regulations and establish such fees and charges.

History.

Code 1950, § 5-36; 1966, c. 576; 1970, c. 717; 1979, c. 272.

§ 5.1-45.
Appropriations by local authorities.

The governing body of any city, town or county to which this chapter is applicable may appropriate or cause to be raised by taxation in such city, town or county a sum sufficient to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 5-39; 1966, c. 576.

§ 5.1-46.
Receipt and handling of federal and other funds.

Any county, city or town in Virginia may accept, receive and receipt for federal moneys, and other moneys, either public or private, for the acquisition, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance and operation of airports and landing fields and other air navigation facilities, and is authorized and empowered to comply with the provisions of the laws of the United States and any rules and regulations made thereunder for the expenditure of federal moneys in connection with such airports, landing fields and air navigation facilities.

History.

Code 1950, § 5-25; 1966, c. 576; 1979, c. 272; 1988, c. 70.